Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 46-1204.01 to 46-1216 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 39;

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1145.